
                   Dr. Jackson's Mechanics of Materials class is pretty rough. He does a pretty good job of explaining things, but he can be vague sometimes during examples. Make sure you study well for his tests, they are intense. All in all, interesting class, great guy, good teacher.
                
                   Very knowledgeable and you are either going to learn engineering or quit and join the band.
                
                   Tough but very fair. You are going to learn Engineering. if you cant hang then join the band.
                
                   Great in ENGR 1201 and early classes, but becomes somewhat lackluster later in upper level classes and electives. Is not good with keeping track of student schedules and gives assignments in bulk which often leads to frustration for students who take more than one class with him. Easily accessible though if you have questions. Gives hard tests.
                
                   Great professor. Super Smart. Very hard but very fair. Heat transfer is his baby.
                
                   Awesome instructor. very helpful insde and outside the class room. best instructor ever in WT. teaches very well.if u really want to learn the material, pick him.he is smart.u enjoy his lectures.he jokes with his students n in somehow he is serious too.study well.
                
                   Tough classes and hard professor, but is do-able. Not too much homework, but very difficult tests. He teaches all the thermo and heat transfer stuff. For heat transfer, there will be A LOT of labs reports to write. Thermodynamics and thermal fluid design are challenging but not so bad. Pretty boring lectures unfortunately.
                
                   A genuinely nicer guy, willing to help anyone so long as you send him an e-mail. I have taken a few of his classes and come out with A's and B's. His teaching method makes complex ideas seem elementary. If you have to choose, choose Whigham.
                
                   Whigham is an amazing teacher. He doesn't skip steps, explains everything clearly, gives reasonable homework, fair tests, and does everything that he can to help his students.
                
                   Poor communication skills, and unwilling to assist students with any examples or direction whatsoever. Avoid at all costs, any other professor is much better.
                
                   Tough but fair
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Excellent professor. Great teaching style, lots of example problems. You will come out of this class with a real understanding of dynamics. Class is difficult, but she is very committed to her students and will spend extra time to help you understand the material. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED.
                
                   If you take her classes, you will actually learn something! And that's a good thing.
                
                   Only class I had to retake, and I had to retake it twice.  Unfortunately she was always the only prof that fit into my schedule.
                
                   He doesn't give many examples to back up all the theory being taught. Homework is very difficult, and so are the exams. He doesn't really curve the exams, so make sure to really study for them.
                
                   He has an accent and is very hard to understand. He doesn't do many examples in class. He is used to upper level classes, so he assumes the students know more, and he doesn't cover everything. There is no partial credit on exams, which are only 3-4 questions, so the averages ranged from 30%-50% with no curves given.
                
                   He has been one of my favorite professors. Makes the material fun and easy and shows cool real life application videos. The class is a breeze as long as you put in a small effort.
                
                   Worst prof I've ever had at A&M.  He was totally disinterested in teaching us the material.  He was also very unapproachable.  On top of all that, he wasn't very knowledgeable about the material that he was professing! You would go ask him a question about the hw, and he'd just look at you with a blank stare, and say figure it out!
                
                   The class is hard to begin with, but the professor does a really good job of explaining the material and trying to make the class interesting. The tests are tough just because of the material but he is always available to help if you go to his office.
                
                   He should prepare better and explain better. Otherwise, don't take the class from him.
                
                   Doesn't exactly teach, just flips through a slideshow. Not helpful at all. Tests are predictable though, and he gives out previous tests to study from.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor Wickliff is a good teacher. I had problems with my group for ENGR 111, and my team mates and I emailed her and she was understanding with our issues. 
                
                   Honestly, she is a great professor really understanding and wants everyone to pass. You get partial credit for just trying and turning stuff in. The class in general is just not structured well and is very confusing.
                
                   She is very helpful and is always looking to improve her class and assist her students. She pushes you to ask questions. Makes more than enough help available in order to do well in this class. She is down to Earth and I would definitely take her class again!
                
                   Good guest speakers. Guaranteed A as long as you turn in your work.
                
                   She is a very sweet lady. Majority of the time there are guest lecturers, which makes the class more interesting. NO EXAMS, but quizzes every class. The lab is more writing and speech based. You have to write a 700-1000 word essay every week and research a current event. Students make the quiz questions. EASY and INTERESTING class.
                
                   Real world assignment problems using methods and approaches currently being employed by the industry. Also, don't buy the text book
                
                   great class. no tests. quizzes every day. weekly writing assignments(2pgs tops). lots of guest lecturers
                
                   very good
                
                   no matter who you get ENGR111 will probably suck, however fink is a cool guy. he never really knows/cares whats going on so everyone is always just in a general state of confusion. he had an easier first test than most profs and is a nice guy. hes understanding and somehow i ended with an A even though i did bad on a lot of stuff so crazy curve
                
                   He tells you what will be on each test however the TAs grade every assignment.  As long as you do the work - you get an A.
                
                   He was great! really cares about his kids. he missed our class sometimes to go sell his own products, but overall he's a great guy and wants us to do good.
                
                   Loves to talk and relate back to his past experiences in the field. He sometimes will switch the due dates of assignments or change what is due for a specific homework or project, which can be good or bad depending on the assignment. Very few RATS or CFUs, which was great, but lectures were sometimes very tedious.
                
                   Very interesting prof who takes pride in his career accomplishments. He sticks to his schedule and grades pretty fairly; usually returns grades and feedback on daily assignments fairly quickly, which is extremely rare among professors in this course. He relies a lot on the TA's to answer questions but he's a good overall professor to have.
                
                   The class itself was long and boring, not helpful at all. One on one, he was great at clarifying. Not many exams, he always reviewed for the exams and that helped. He is a fairly easy grader, but the TAs also do a lot of grading.
                
                   Dr. Godwin would gives honest advice. He's more flexible about grades than other professors. Like all the ENGR classes, there aren't many tests but the group projects are nightmares. The RATs also paid attention to details from the book sometimes, so be careful about that. Overall, I wouldn't mind having him again and the class isn't too hard.
                
                   Professor Godwin is definitely one of the best profs for ENGR 111/112. He really cares about his students and just wants them to understand/enjoy engineering. You will be sorry if this isn't your prof.
                
                   Professor Godwin is GREAT! There are a lot of homework assignments and group assignments, it is a lot to keep up with. All engr 111 sections are like this. Get him if at all possible. He is extremely helpful.
                
                   TAKE THIS PROF FOR ENGR 111112. Sooo nice and really cares about his students. Very lenient grader, just wants students to do well. This course is an unnecessary amount of work but if you have him he realizes that and makes in manageable. If you pay attention and study a little before test, should be an Easy A. Would take him again in a second.
                
                   Great professor. Teaches the material very well and lets you know exactly what is expected of you. 
                
                   Dr. Godwin is a genuinely nice guy who cares about his students. His lectures are pretty long and sometimes boring because he tends to ramble on and on, but he gets his point across most of the time. His tests are not hard and he is a very easy grader. He urges students to use office hours as he truly wants to help you pass. Definitely take him!
                
                   Introductory engineering class, so expect a lot of work to make you wonder if you want to stay with the major or not. Dr. Godwin is better than some of the engineering professors at Texas A&M
                
                   Dr. Godwin  wants is for his students to do really well. We have online lectures before class, then quizzes in class, but Dr. Godwin goes over all of the material before the in class quizzes, and he's the only professor that helps out like that. He also gives you an A if you learn, so it's super easy to get an A in the class. Highly recommend him. 
                
                   Concepts are not explained thoroughly, and questions are met with either hostility or answers that are not related to the question asked. Requirements for homework and in class work are confusing and often change while you are working on them, so that it is very difficult to actually know what is required of you.
                
                   Dr. Graves is a great professor, despite the rough course material of ENGR 111. He does a great job making the lectures more interesting than they have to be, and told interesting stories from his own life that related to the lectures. Probably the best professor for ENGR 111 - taking him again for 112.
                
                   This man is very clear in his lectures, and out of all my friends that I've spoken to, he seems to be the most likely to actually cover all the information that will be on the test. Gives a good amount of homework and typically the TAs were very lenient in grading. Great person and wants people to be honest, consistent, and determined.
                
                   Graves is a great dudedefinitely tough but he's there for you.
                
                   Like other Engineering classes at A&M, it depends on your group... I made a B in the class because none in my group knew how to code. In general, he is very personal and he is also very nice. If I had a better group, I could've gotten an A. Oh and he gives A LOT of homework and no extra credit
                
                   ENGR 111 is a lot of work. Expect a lot of homework in addition to the robot (hope for a good team). That being said, Dr. Graves is a great professor. He is very personable. He is willing to go out of his way to help if he sees that you care and are trying to do well in the class. Would definitely take him again.
                
                   Graves really does care and is happy to talk to students about whatever problems. He is a brand new professor, so he isn't well versed in how freshman engineering works; but really, does any professor really know whats going on? He's a cool guy; as long as you act confidently and do all the assignments, you'll have no problem with the class.
                
                   Dr. Graves is an army vet who taught at West Point. He definitely is a presence and commands respect. He wants to see his students succeed. If you put forth the effort. he will meet you halfway. Overall nice guy and will be taking him again in 112.
                
                   Good course I'd take it again.
                
                   This class was a blast! - Seriously, I highly recommend. You'll develop an understanding of basic polymer struc - prop relationships at the beginning and then she turns you loose to apply this theory toward inventive polymeric biomaterial applications (ie. "create a contact lens w X,Y,Z properties"). So much fun. Take it. Heck, I'd take it twice!
                
                   Haglund taught this class very well.  Completely different teaching style than that of MEEN 260.  I took MEEN 363 as a summer course, we had one homework assignment each week and 6 exams.  Haglund did a great job explaining application, as well as delving into each type of problem with a lot of thought and a desire to teach the class.
                
                   A textbook wasn't required for this course, which made it very tough.  For me, working many examples on my own time helps prepare me for exams and I was unable to do so.  The only form of practice was from the homework, which he made up on his own, therefore, no examples could be found on the internet in order to help.
                
                   Dr. Haglund is a nice guy that does actually want you to learn. He gives plenty of theory and plenty of examples. Lots of homework, but it helps with preparing for exams. 
                
                   Dr. Heffington was a great professor. Too bad he's retired.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Do all the homeworks by yourself. Mid-terms and the final are a killer, but good class participation can make up for it. Oh. and there's also a final project. Tough class, but well worth it.
                
                   He doesn't explain things very well and its very easy to fall asleep in his lectures. He seems like a nice person though.
                
                   Lots of homework, but it truly helps you prepare for the tests. Dr. Hogan is an excellent professor who really does care.
                
                   He was fair enough in grading. The first project on AutoCAD was pretty insane, but besides that it was pretty good. There is something due just about every class period, so you have to be there. He is sorta creepy, and he left the room a lot. However, he seems to know what he is doing.
                
                   She's a very easy grader. Our first test we got very low scores SO SHE GAVE US A RETEST AND THEN LATER CURVED THE TEST by taking the square root of our grade and multiplying by 10. All tests are online, she gives 5% extra credit by doing self-assessment quizzes after every lecture, solutions to these Q's are in a folder related to the class.
                
                   Great prof
                
                   No Comments
                
                   good, but strict
                
                   Easy introduction course to medical imaging.
                
                   Dr Kalmar-Nagy was an excellent lecturer, if not the best. He was passionate and enthusiastic. Demanding, but in a good way. Very approachable person, in spite of his busy schedule. I wish him the best.
                
                   Bad guy, stay away.
                
                   Good Knowledgeable teacher! Not welcoming to encourage you for asking questions or visiting him for help! You would not ever knock his office door. what you get in the class is all and you must find a friend with an smile to discuss any question you may face after class! 
                
                   The professor is an expert in the field, and the course by nature is difficult and you will have to work for it. 
                
                   Dr. Kianfar is very intelligent, teaches in a clear manner, is an expert in the subjects he teaches and is very fair.  His class was appropriately difficult for a graduate course.  My only complaint is that he isn't very personable and his manner discourages you from going for help.  However, I do like him as an instructor and will take him again.
                
                   The lab was very straight-forward and easy. The homework was quick and easy too. The exams were very challenging though compared to everything else in the class. A real 180 of what you might expect in terms of difficulty, so be sure to study for them.
                
                   awesome prof, good teacher and funny
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome professor.  Made class interesting and fun.
                
                   Best prof I've ever had.  Always willing and wanting to answer questions.  There are reason's why he wins faculty of the year awards.
                
                   this prof. was absolutely horrible. he was not helpful and wanted his students to fail. avoid this prof. at all costs!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   
                
                   There were daily in class work assignments. Weekly quizzes. On average 2 home works per week.
                
                   Mcvay is a great prof. Very clear lectures, very nice and helpful 1-on-1. 10/10, would recommend.
                
                   Dr. McVay is a great professor. She has very organized notes in class and posts them online the following week. Takes attendance through in class work, 1 every class, and online in class quizzes on fridays. The material is easy if you go to lecture and take good notes. She's great, I would definitely advise taking her! 
                
                   The BEST 221 instructor. She's not a researching professor, so teaching is her number 1 priority. She explains well and gives great examples. 
                
                   This course will get you interested in petroleum engineering.  It is an easy A/high B, as long as you read every week and attend class. Dr. Lane teaches the material well, and gives some great advice that extends outside of the material.  I enjoy going to this class every week.
                
                   
                
                   Great class
                
                   I would take another class by this professor
                
                   Avoid at all cost
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. O overall was a really nice professor. The class as a whole was awful, because its so unorganized but Dr. O really worked with us. Many of the homework assignments ended up basically being participation grades but we didn't know that until the class was over. I will likely take her again next semester. Just work hard and you'll do fine!
                
                   Take Dr. O! ENGR 111 is a class that isn't well-organized. Dr. O makes it a whole lot less stressful. We had some good TA's that were very helpful and understanding. You're going to be doing a lot of programming through MatLab & LabVIEW which you will utilize in your group projects. You're also going to use LEGO EV3 Robotics throughout the course. 
                
                   Dr. O is great! I mean the class is pretty bad, but Dr. O makes the class better and really helps out! If students are struggling with something, she'll make sure everyone understands before moving onto the next topic. She really cares that the student's learn. Glad I'm taking her class again next semester!
                
                   The class is a lot of work since it is meant to be a weed-out class, but Dr O teaches the material well and will push back due dates if students don't understand. If you put in effort, you'll be fine. There was a huge curve that bumped the grade on my first test up from an 83 to a 102. Beware non-CS or CE majors: there is a lot of programming.
                
                   Dr. O is a fun & knowledgeable professor. She takes feedback from her students consistently & adjusts the curriculum accordingly such that the work is fair. She replies to emails right away and is always ready to help. ENGR111 is an infant course with kinks still needed to be worked out, & Dr. O helps alleviate frustrations. Take Dr. O! :)
                
                   Dr. O  will not make it easy for you, but she is willing to work with you to keep your grade where it needs to be, and she's a good teacher. If you actually pay attention in lecture, do the homework, and participate in class you'll be fine
                
                   Dr.O was an awesome professor, she is very intelligent and is very good at helping students when they are struggling with a concept. She is very flexible, and as mentioned, is likely to completely change her agenda in order to meet her students needs. 
                
                   She's great. Yeah 111 is going to suck but if you have her you pretty much got as lucky as you can get. Very willing to help, just let her know you're struggling. Super nice lady, and really interacts with students.
                
                   Dr. O is an amazing individual.  She will e-mail you back instantaneously.  She often drops what is supposed to be lectured according to the agenda, and talks about what students are struggling in.  She curves like a maniac, because she knows her course sucks, but its not her fault.  She is amazing, and I would take again.
                
                   Don't take her
                
                   ENGR 111 in general is a BS class and is too time consuming for a 2 credit course. She just serves to make things worse.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Super nice guy, very down to earth. Cares about his students and does his best to help you out (approachable, gives extra credit, grades fairly). The class itself, however, needs to be reworked. Its a big time commitment for only two hours of credit, but its a required class so you'll have to suck it up. A lot of group work and outside assignments.
                
                   Dr. Poston is amazing! This class is about teaching communications in nuclear engineering topics. He has personal stories and experiences that add to the class value. I can honestly not recommend this highly enough. He gives so much wisdom and makes the class fun and informative.
                
                   The TA taught most the class. Overall, do your work, you'll pass. Dr. Poston is a very cool professor and knows a lot about engineering but not much about the ENGR111 curriculum. He's understanding with the students and cracks a joke here and there, but really just more of an awesome guy overall than a teacher for this class. Would recommend though
                
                   Poston is in his 70's so the ta's taught all of the programming. He was a really cool professor but didnt really do  much. 
                
                   Doesn't understand programming so the TA taught our class. When asked about projects he had no idea what we were talking about. I'm sure his is a smart man but he does not like teaching 111!
                
                   He is very dedicated to his teachings. The lessons are comprehensive, but do require engagements. Logistics isn't a major you choose to become mediocre, Dr. Rana definitely expects his students to go above and beyond in class as it is required in a career in this field . 
                
                   Want a class where you learn nothing? Look no further than Dr. Red, his two tests and quiz are open notes, open book. If you already have an understanding for thermodynamics take his class, he had to curve the tests extremely since no one actually learned anything in lecture.
                
                   You use your book and notes for quizzes and tests. He grades more than fair on his tests.
                
                   Make sure you grab someone who knows CC++ socket programming WELL. It will be the difference between spending 5 hours on the homework assignments or 40 hours. Tests are difficult, but as long as you try you should get a B in the class at least.
                
                   He has an acceptable accent.  He is willing to help students, but ONLY during his office hours.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This is the most annoying class you will take for engineering, but having it with Richard is no fun. His lectures are unrelated and long, the quizzes suck and come from nowhere, and you essentially have to solely teach yourself how to code using MatLab and LabView. Getting a good grade depends on if you have good teammates and TA's that grade easy.
                
                   Any ENGR 111 class is going to be challenging because it is like a "weed out" course, but Dr. Richard wasn't very helpful. He always relied on his TA's to teach. It's a manageable class if you have awesome TA's, but that's not always guaranteed. I would recommend taking another professor who is more clear with instructions, due dates, and material.
                
                   His engineering class was a lot of work. Expect to do a lot of work outside of class and to have assignments ready for class. He does a good job when giving lectures but doesn't help very much with assignments, questions, and projects as he expects you to figure it out for yourself which is the purpose of engineering and this class.
                
                   The TAs ultimately run the class. They grade the assignments, keep the submission box open for way longer than the deadline suggests, and are the ones who actually give out help, though many times they don't know exactly how to solve a labview problem, in Matlab they are usually pretty helpful.  Tests are amazingly easy, but homework isn't.
                
                   He can be kind of funny but that doesn't make up for the fact that he doesn't really teach us. He makes a lot of analogies that are meant to make us laugh (which sometimes they do) but they don't help us learn the material.
                
                   Dr. Richard is not a very helpful instructor. He leaves most of the work to the TA's and you are expected to learn most information on your own. Would not recommend.
                
                   The guy is clearly knowledgeable but his demeanor just plainly shows that he doesn't care and most of the time he speaks in a tone that lets everyone know that he wants to be there less than we do. He communicates very poorly with the TA's so they usually have no clue what is happening. Only saving grace is that the TA's graded easily. No curves.
                
                   Generally unclear,  and uninteresting. I really did not enjoy my class. If I could go back, I would have taken a different professor.
                
                   There are pros and cons to taking Richard. He is very intelligent and has a wide base of knowledge. His lectures aren't the most clear and he doesn't do a great job explaining new concepts. With the new format of 112, expect to teach yourself a good amount of material before each exam. There is little feedback until you get your test grades.
                
                   Dr. Lara... was interesting. If it was not for his AWFUL TA, his class would have been a decent course. Good, enthusiastic professor who cares passionately about what he does. He is extremely vague on details concerning due dates, assignments and honestly he just avoids questions very well. I can not say I really retained any content.
                
                   I'm not exactly sure what happened in this class even now.  No one knew when things were due (including the TAs).  The homework isn't actually difficult most of the time, but knowing when it is due is the real challenge.
                
                   It's an easy class if you do the work. Lots of group projects and busy work. He's a cool prof but the TA runs the class. He occasionally went over lecture slides but the TA does all the grading and actually knows the material. If you want help, go to the TA, not Dr. Lara-Ruiz. If you get a good TA, you'll be fine.
                
                   Dr. Ruiz didn't teach most of the class. His TA did. When he did teach he read from the powerpoint.  I had a good TA,  so my class was good but not everyone got lucky. He is willing to move due dates back if a lot of students don't understand the material. There is a lot of outside work but that's just 111 in general. 
                
                   Not the most interesting class but very laid back and cares about  his students and will try to do what he can to help. Often moves hw back when students need it or don't understand it.
                
                   Professor Lara cares about his students. This course is just generally a mess, but he tries to make it easier. While other reviews may be bad, you have to realize that this course was not designed to be too organized. Just go to his class and do the homework and you will do well.
                
                   Hes not interesting, he just talks monotone.  He cares, but isn't ever available, he even gave us the wrong email address and never fixed it.  An easy A. No curve.  
                
                   I would have enjoyed this teacher more if it were not for the class. Engr 111 is a horrible weed out class so it is hard not to give a poor review.
                
                   He's a great engineer, but his teaching skills aren't the best.  He would simply read the slides.  I had to teach myself almost everything in that class
                
                   How you see this prof depends on your maturity level - I see the other reviews written from the typical coddled teenagers perspective. This class sets the foundation for mech engr. If you desire to learn, he has a passion for teaching you. He may be quirky, but just look at his resume - its obvious he's there for you, not for the money.
                
                   At first his class seems alright and its pretty easy but he comes off as a d!ck (he doesn't change). Then he starts to do one example a class and the class is over an hr long. He assigns u homework and doesn't even put the notes up on time for u to do it. Avoid him if u can, hes such a complete tool(you'll know what i mean if u take him).
                
                   hard tests, and hes a dick to you if you're late.  actually, hes kinda just an overall dick, but his material isnt really hard in itself.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The worst class i have ever taken, if you take it, it is nothing but totally a waste of your time, you will never learn anything useful from him. 
                
                   Wasting of time and lots of useless projects. He often got stuck on the board and treat his TA like a dog. Always say other professors' books or notes were garbage and I still can not find  his knowledge in turbine machinery.
                
                   He was one of the kind. Never answer questions always think students never work hard. Lots of class projects but he never cares about how the results came from but only care about the figures generated. Attending to his class was a totally waste of my life.
                
                   hes brillant just cant teach and is toooo hard
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He may have been good once, but he's mostly interested in his grandchildren now.
                
                   Very good Prof.
                
                   
                
                   Dr. Arun Srinivasa is one of the best professors to have taught mechanical engineering at the TAMU-Q campus, simply because he was a breath of fresh air. Great at giving real world examples and seems enthusiastic about teaching the course. 
                
                   Thinks he is funny, sometimes is. Explains himself again if he thinks he can explain the point differently. Takes a practical approach to teaching.
                
                   Great teacher, walks you through the material so you understand it. Wants to help those who want to succeed. Highly reccommend taking his class
                
                   &quot;The math yall learn here in america could go up my nose and not even make me sneeze&quot;   &quot;Is that obvious to you&#63;&quot;
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He was kinda hard to understand sometimes because of his accent, but he taught the material very well. He would also repeat himself if he knew he had said something too fast. I would take one of his classes again.
                
                   AMAZING professor! He knows his stuff and is willing to help you if something is unclear. He worked with NASA for 20 something' years so he'll share stories, unclassified ones of course. The workload won't be easy, but it's not impossible. Enjoy it!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great Professor!!
                
                   He makes the class soo much fun. If u get a chance to take please do.
                
                   One of the best professors I've had thus far.  Lot's of fun and usually quite laid back.
                
                   Great Prof.  Makes class fun.  Highly recommend.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great prof, highly recommend him. Whiteacre is good too... so have fun in this class if you get both of these great professors!
                
                   LOVE this prof! He was a lawyer for 30 years so this phil of law class was awesome. He really knows what he is talking about and makes you so interested in the material. His tests were kind of hard and a little unpredictable but not too tough. Only take him if you are motivated to learn the material because it is not a blow-off class.
                
                   Not a fun class by any means... I could never tell what was expected of me, and try as I might, I only had a very loose grasp of the material.
                
                   pretty easy class overall except you have an essay and journal entry due every monday morning. attendance is 25% of your overall grade. Final exam is an essay
                
                   I've never seen someone so excited about VBA Programming. He is hard to understand at some points but is very enthusiastic. Gives Pop-quizzes at the beginning of class. Tests are very similar to the given practice exams. Homework is required to do well on the quizzes. Tests are still hard. 4 tests and (Hwquiz) are 20% each. Curve at end of class.
                
                   Great guy, retired in 2009.
                
                   Very good graphics professor
                
                   He cares and is very passionate about student learning and development.
                
                   You don't have to do anything, just show up
                
                   He shows up and gives the lectures, but homework and exams are very spontaneous (think like no more than a week notice). Exams are long and he kind of asks the same questions repeatedly on them. 
                
                   Look this guy up on the jail search for the Brazos County Justice Web. That should be all you need to know.
                
                   Really cared about students.  Made online learning productive and well organized. I thought he was outstanding but no nonsense.
                
                   Non responsive. Posted one grade 2 months after assignment was turned in and nothing since. No one has any idea how well they are doing. Avoid at all costs.
                
                   - No feedback, No Response for emails, No classes held, No clarity in requirements
                
                   okay
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Elam hadn't taught Calculus since the mid-90s but he was, by far, one of the best professors I've ever had. He explained everything clearly and worked many examples in class to make sure you understood the material. Cal II is the hardest one, but he made it interesting and not too difficult. Practice a lot. Allowed cheat sheets for all exams.
                
                   Uncommunicative and extremely unforgiving grading.
                
                   Greatest Professor Ever!
                
                   Teaches good, but his exams and grading style are made to fail students.
                
                   no comments
                
                   na
                
                   Needs to retire!
                
                   I was in IE 101.He even don't know to solve the problems. He took whole class to sove 1 question and even made correct. He start asking to student about what do you figureout&#63; He didn't check our homework well. He just give check sign. We even don't know we did right or not. His grading style is bad. He give 40 points for 1 Q most application hard.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher!  She more or less tells you what is on the test, but if you go to every class, she covers exactly what is on the test.  She is always looking to help students make the most of themselves.  You can even use a notecard on her tests and write whatever you want on it.
                
                   The class was very easy. All you have to do is show up, pay attention, follow his instructions and then do the extremely easy HW. If you get stuck, he's very helpful and clear about how to do things. He has great sense of humor. Just don't be dumb and don't do the HW last-minute. Absolutely nothing challenging about this class. Easy A. Period.
                
                   All student got "A" in his class. He is very helpful.
                
                   Amazing teacher. So helpful and has a great sense of humor. Very easy assignments
                
                   Is very knowledgeable about civil and construction engineering. He has extensive experience in the field, but struggles quite a bit teaching the material. Gives HW and quizzes constantly so study and practice every day. Certain chapters are harder and trickier than others. Him not teaching too well just complicates things more. Overall, cool class.
                
                   He was thrown into the course right after getting hired. He didn't have a clue how to teach this class. He's from China so his English is a bit broken, but you can understand him. Talks a lot! Can come across as rude and demeaning b/c the discipline here isn't as strict as in China. Didn't learn much in this class. Keeps you whole time. Easy HW.
                
                   He is an awesome guy and one of the easiest teachers I've ever had.  His whole life has been about helping students.. and as far as grades, he'll give you whatever you want, he just wants you to learn the material.  Last semester was his last to teach though.
                
                   he is very easy to understand and he will help you at the drop of a dime.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Teaches well, but always seems to give his students a C.  Also, he never returns papers back to the students.
                
                   Good teacher, but teaches out of date material.  Uses his life experiences well though, makes class entertaining most of the time.
                
                   Made the class interesting, always gave time for students.
                
                   good teaching and helpful
                
                   he is  cool
                
                   he's cool
                
                   you should be ready to do your own work.prof is extremly helpful and makes harder material easy to understand.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's a good teacher. His notes are VERY thorough, which can be exhausting when trying to copy it all down but they make a great reference guide for the class material. He's approachable in his office and he's always willing to answer any questions. He provides solutions for tests and homework assignments so he's excellent when it comes to feedback!
                
                   Pompous and aloof. Spends the whole class deriving equations and never really explaining anything. Has a nervous tick of hacking through out the entire lecture. After 20 years of teaching, you'd think he would have gotten over that.
                
                   It was a brand new class that I had already taken at a different university on graphics. I hardly ever went but when I did I ended up helping him. Nice guy and extremely fair and reasonable.
                
                   He's ok, but he speaks what's on his mind and loves to talk about past work. Wastes time and doesn't know why you can't do unit conversions.
                
                   I had this guy for Dynamics for the fall semester of 2014. He isn't a bad professor. He does read directly off of the powerpoints and he does have a tendency to solve problems on his own when practicing, but he isn't a bad guy. Read the book, practice problems on your own time and you will pass. He let us use formula sheets on tests as well.
                
                   Easy class. Just go to class and do the assignments and you will do great. Dr. Fox has allot to share and is very organized and informative. He tells you when he will quiz you and what will be one quizzes. If you do not do well in this course it is on you.
                
                   Very poor instructor, he reads directly from powerpoint slides and show no interest in the material or the students.
                
                   He's not a great teacher but he's not THAT bad either. I've had worse engineering professors than him honestly. He does read off the slides mostly but at least he shows in-depth details on how to solve the problems. It helped me understand the material. Dyamics is hard itself so I can't blame him for difficulty entirely. He's an okay teacher.
                
                   If you are an engineering major at TAMUCC, having this guy is inevitable. There is a reason why many engineering students change majors and this man is why. He reads directly off the slides and is an awful speaker. He is also completely and totally useless when help is needed. He gives the class problems and expects us to do it with no prior info.
                
                   He looks very kind, but actually not! He is just reading the textbook for you on class from his powerpoint, and the exam are all about the concepts in the textbook and powerpoint, nothing useful! You don't need to understand anything! Just remember the concepts in the powerpoint and the textbook, you will be fine.
                
                   OKAY, in the beginning I was like yes it is easy I will pass within an A. first of all, Adrian didn't pass syllabus. So it was very bad because I didn't know hoe many points did the homework or test were worth. Doesn't grade homework nor tests on time. I never knew where I stood before the final. I was socked with GETTING F. I am not a bad student.
                
                   He is a great teacher. Moves kinda slow but enforces the "must knows" and develops a student with a strong foundation. Plenty of opportunities to succeed in his class. Take good notes. There's more than one way to solve problems. Think outside the box. 
                
                   Don't take this class. The workload is so extreme you'll never be finished on time. The labs are unclear and most of the time she won't know exactly how to do it. It is mainly a self-taught class and there's an unreasonable expectation to scan all work online as well as write down in the engineer notebook. Scanning 50 pages one at a time is tedious
                
                   A lot of work but good teacher
                
                   The class is very easy and she makes it easier. Although at times it is hard to understand her, she is very nice! She assigns alot of work, but it's easy so don't worry. The answers are in the book, just skim through to find them. On labs, she lets her TA do all the work, so be careful, sometimes it's harder understanding them than it is her.
                
                   Her intro to engineering tech class is a lot of fun, but a lot of work. You get a good idea of what engineering is all about. You learn a lot, both math and presentation skills.
                
                   She's a fairly good professor, but she assigns WAY to much work at one time. It gets very overwhelming and it becomes difficult to balance all of your classes. If you're good at keeping on top of things and don't mind a lot of work all at once, you should be just fine in her class.
                
                   She's fairly nice to the students, but hard to understand with her thick accent. The instructions are rather vague and need more explanation, but the assignments are sort of repetitive so you'll get the hang of it. But beware: you will have a LOT of homework in this class. She expects a lot out of her students, so make sure you stay on top!
                
                   Good hands on learning of engineering principles. This is the class out of the whole ME program that I used the most lab equipment.
                
                   He may be a capable individual on his own but when it comes to teaching he can't clearly tell you how to make a ham sandwich. Be prepared to waste 2-3 hours of your life each time you go to class. Instead of teaching this man reads the text book the ENTIRE class period. This is college for God's sake.
                
                   Dr. Simionescu is a good professor, but I do have a few gripes with him.  His quizzes and tests are highly predictable, but be very careful with lab reports.  It's not hard to make a decent grade, but he will take ANY opportunity to arbitrarily assign points and deductions.  Follow the directions to the letter, and you should be fine.
                
                   Great teacher! Tests are split into two parts. First is same format as quizzes, definitions and basic memorization questions, close-book. Second, mathematical word problems, open-book. Only three labs for semester, although I would've liked to have more. Quiz every week. He isn't very clear on what's required to do sometimes but he is approachable.
                
                   He is very helpful when it comes to explanations over problems. Very fast paced, his accent is a little tough to understand sometimes. Tests are tough so study all the material he gives you.  Overall good teacher. He helps out his students as best as he can. Doesn't count attendance but that doesn't mean you don't have to go to class!!
                
                   Hao is a great guy. He is always available by email and is quick to respond and answer questions and offer help when needed.  His class is very fast paced, so if you don't have a fairly clear understanding of chemistry going in-he may not be the instructor for you.  His tests are long, hard, and cover a wide variety of material.  GO TO CLASS!!!
                
                   As this is an intro course, I must warn you, show up to class! He's genuinely a nice guy, relatively easy if you study, and will always be there if you have questions. If you are able to ask intelligent questions and contribute to the lecture, you won't have a problem getting an A. Ends class early often.
                
                   Aggressive, bold and commanding when demanding a lot more than needed with sort of retaliation. Lack of touch with outside world.
                
                   He is great
                
                   great man, great teacher- thanks GC
                
                   best professor ever
                
                   Cmdr. Coleman has a cutting edge style of teaching.  No one leaves the class not understanding what he was saying.  In my opinion we should clone Cmdr. Coleman and have him teach more of the MARE classes.
                
                   Best teacher I have ever had! His thermodynamics was relatively difficult, however he does pretty much everything he can to help you pass. He holds homework review sessions, helps students individually, and will give out bonus points for just about anything. Funny guy who enjoys what he teaches. Just dont skip any homeworks  A+A+A+A+A+A+
                
                   Dr. Carroll is probably the best teacher I have had. sure his tests aren't easy but he structures the class so that everyone can get the grade they deserve and worked for. Your grade is an exact reflection of how much effort you put into the class.  
                
                   I have had Dr. Carroll for multiple classes over the years and he really is one of the best professors this school has, you'll never find another teacher like him. He makes the most difficult classes easy and interesting. His homework and projects are fairly simple but his tests can be killer if you don't know what you are doing. 
                
                   All work is completion grade, but don't cheat cause final pretty hard. Also number 1 student in the class right here.
                
                   Dr. Carrol is a great teacher. He gives very clear interesting lectures. He honestly makes engineering fun. Also he worked at Denny's with a doctorate. That's awesome.
                
                   Looking back on this class makes me wonder what was so special about this guy. Class is just snooze fest as Chief Fredrickson mumbles on and on about the same old stories. Though I kinda feel like the title "The Good Garbage Man" could be a movie title. I don't really know what's going on here but I have an A!
                
                   This man is incapable of teaching anything, he simply just wasted our time. It's nice to get A's but this late in the game we need to know what we're supposed to be doing.
                
                   GREAT TEACHER GREAT MAN!!!!!!!!!!
                
                   Chief is the man end of story
                
                   Do your hw outside of class and it will be easier for you. If you dont, you will fail
                
                   He doesn't teach well but got two As out of him. Easy to get along with and exams are exact copies of class lecture notes.
                
                   possibly the worst prof i have ever had.  very hard to understand, gives lectures over stuff and assigns homework that has absolutely nothing to do with lecture. homework is very hard and he does not teach anything that is on it at all. makes the class way harder than a 112 class should be and does not help at all.  DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF!!!!!!!!!!!
                
                   I think he think that alot of his student are stupid and when asked about a problem to solve he always seems to talk about something else and just help solve the problem or know how to. 1 OF THE WORTHS TEACHERS I HAD at TEXAS A&M GALVESTON.
                
                   He is so bad of a teacher that he doesnt prepare for class even though we are supposed to. I think he hates teaching and would rather do research.
                
                   he sucks at teaching and doesnt understand anything you ask of him, with that you cannot understand him
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great prof. Puts effort into teaching and wants his students to understand the material.
                
                   
                
                   This class was the advance electrical course. I though I knew everything I could know already... well that answer was NO... The class was hard to understand because of the type of content. It was a struggle to keep up. But, Vinny was willing to take his own time and explain it better for us. He also is better a drawing his lectures to explain
                
                   This class was rough and kick my (insert word here)... However, I learned a lot. I knew very little about diesels. Vinny took his own time to show and explain every basic component so I could practically wrap my head around the theory. Vinny is a good guy, great in person, horrible lecturer. 
                
                   Vinny is an amazing man and an amazing engineer. He is under appreciated and over worked. His classes are very difficult and cover a lot of material. He is not able to cover a lot of the material in class. I recommend reading ALL the book and visiting him in his office. He can explain anything one on one.
                
                   Mostly the female, like-minded idiot or thug can survive in that class.
                
                   The diesels class at TAMUG is one of the more practical and hands-on experiences you will have as a student! Mr. Treglia takes his diesel engines very seriously, so this class is a little more demanding than his other ones.
                
                   Taking this class opened my mind to ideas which have been previously been unfathomable. Mr. Treglia is completely unafraid to dive into a diverse range of topics while in class. Also this man is one of the few instructors that will help you understand why your answers are incorrect. Vinny is very patient and I wish that more profs were like him.
                
                   This man is the best instructor I've ever had here! The compassion for electricity Mr. Tregli demonstrates goes far above and beyond my expectations.  Everyone should take at least one class with Vinny, it's an easy A!
                
                   He sucks Shows up up late or either hungover
                
                   Excellent Professor, knows the material inside and out and is always happy to help during office hours.  The material is challenging but you will learn a lot in any class he offers.
                
                   Great professor! Totally recommend taking classes w/ him.
                
                   Good guy, knows all his 50+ students by name. Very helpful and demonstrates interest. Speaks both english and spanish very well. His classes are boring at times bc they are based of powerpoints, but other than that, good professor. Expect homework at least once a week.
                
                   he aight
                
                   His class was so boring, He would make us fall asleep. I learned more in the lab for the class by his T.a. then he taught all semester in the class.
                
                   This is a pretty easy lab.  It is kind of boring and the labs are never more than an hour long.
                
                   Very hard to understand, but he teaches well.  And make sure to take his portfolio serious.
                
                   This was such a terrible class its not supposed to hard its a mere 2 credit class that is supposed to introduce you to the fields of engineering but she makes an easy class hard to try to weed ppl out of the program. If your just trying to get to main campus take the marine engineering engr 111. That was ridiculous. 
                
                   She's the worst professor I've had while attending TAMUG. She's very finicky and demands far more than other professors. Not specific with what material will be on the tests; it's nearly impossible to get an A on an assignment; she is minimal to no help with assignments. She explains nothing. Also, she reads verbatim from her power points. 010
                
                   Doctor Wood is an extremely hard teacher. She grades very roughly. Even when you think you passed something with flying colors, think again. She counts off so many points for the littlest things. If you go into her office and talk to her, she is semi genuinely helpful. But her class was awful. Worked so hard in this class and still didn't make an A
                
                   She's amazing. Really clear in class. Tests are hard, but the information is all from the PowerPoints that she puts online.
                
                   She teaches a weed-out class that is supposed to be difficult, as a result she gives lots of tough assignments.  She is a good teacher though, try talking to her outside of class, while I personally never did this I heard she is very helpful.
                
                   i had Wood for engr 111. She seems like a mean person in the lecture but isn't in the lab or if you talk to her face-to-face. From what my friends told me (they had Dr. Beach for the lab), Dr. Wood is much more helpful in the labs and assigns much easier work. She will help you with any questions, and she even helps you on your final autoCAD exam!
                
                   Horrible teacher, very hard. Does not teach and tests are sporadic. first test class average 36
                
                   angry, avoid,and the things she emphasizes are the things that arent important for engineers
                
                   I wish she taught all of my classes. She is very clear and easy to understand, and she will go out of her way to help you. The only way you'll fail is if you are a true dummy, or you're just too lazy to put in the required effort. Would recommend her to ANYONE! Definitely will take her again
                
                   Good professor
                
                   Great teacher over all. Clear and easy to understand even on difficult lecture topics.
                
                   My 2nd class with her, after statics. Quite possibly the best prof in the engr department, really helpful, makes hard material easy, easily approachable, posts material online. Gives practice exams as well. Overall good teacher.
                
                   she was one of the great professor in Civil department
                
                   Come to lectures, take good notes (record them with your phone) because he talks about the tests during class and will literally spell out answers to questions.   Do the homework because you can use it on tests.   Allows a sheet of notes on the tests. We had 3 tests (2/3 tests were mandatory, the third test was optional) and 1 final.   
                
                   Attendance to lectures is very important as his tests are based off them and the homework. You are required to write programs in excel and he allows you to use not only the programs on the test but he also allows you to use a 8.5"x11" paper with notes on the tests.  He also gives a review sheet and tells you exactly what to prepare for each test.
                
                   This teacher is the best teacher in the department, he is very knowledgeable and in his class he teaches you an engineering skill and then he tests you over what he taught you.   He does not try to play tricks on you and is straight forward.
                
                   Had chisholm for conservation principles.  He goes very slow and does not cover a lot of material.  I'm not sure if I learned everything I needed to in this class.  However, he explains things clearly and is always trying to actively assist struggling students.
                
                   He teaches in MS degree like an elementary school teacher and has not any research area at this time (2012). All of the semester with him can be summarized in less than 20 hours and its not good at all for a master student!
                
                   Great professor.  Made things easier to understand.  Great at helping you out one on one.  Not an easy course though (had for Air Pol. Control & Fluids), so you will have to work.
                
                   He is very flexible with the way you solve a problem. You can use any tool to solve the problem, but you have to show a reasonable result. In my opinion, he is very knowledgeable and gives lots of assignment that will make you think hard.
                
                   sorry but Dr,Faruqi is a great professor .very helpful at  the times . everything he says is clear an understanding at all times . very dedicated to his students always! ! Great professor we need more like him . ;) loved his class!
                
                   Very nice guy and willing to help out if you go by his office.  If you are genuinely interested in the material and study and do the homework he will recognize it and go out of his way to help you understand any confusion.  His lectures deal with the ideas of the topic and the homework can be a bit different but it will make you think.
                
                   Teaches the exact same example problems from another book (Hibbeler Structural Analysis) but yet makes you buy a much more complicated and useless book. He teaches just the basic and leaves you with hard homework problems. Tests are easy if you know what you are doing. Weighs homework a lot, so turn it all in. Repeats tests.
                
                   Dr. Faruqi is a very poor teacher. He is a nice guy, but he lacks alot of skills that could get his points across. He tends to ramble in class and never get to a point, He constantly does example problems but never does homework problems or explains further than the basic concept. He teaches you how to do the easy problems but leaves you to do the hard problems. He says to go by his office for help, but tells you to find a tutor if you do go by his office. Very hard teacher, nice guy though.
                
                   Very hard class.  He is a good teacher, but the class can almost be unreasonable.  The homework starts off pretty easy, but towards the end of the semester it is almost impossiable.
                
                   NICE
                
                   Absolute gem I dont know why he has no rating here. This person and professor is great.
                
                   He is awesome, he works with you, and he is an easy A.
                
                   Glusing is an AMAZING teacher! He's a really nice guy too! I have had difficulty mastering AutoCAD and even though he might tease you and say "Did you break it again?" he is more than happy to help you fix mistakes.
                
                   Great professor
                
                   
                
                   you can't understand a word he says, half the time he doesn't realy know whats goin no, great time to check your e-mail any myspace
                
                   Dr. Leelani is very wise, and really knows his stuff. If you pay attention in class, and ask questions, you will do well in his class. He uses power points, so be sure to TAKE NOTES. His tests are difficult but if you study a little, you are fine. He is a great man, with a hilariously funny sense of humor. Don't hesitate to take him, he's the best.
                
                   He is awesome, absolutely awesome.
                
                   He will challenge his students and give grades based on how hard a student tries and how well they do against each other. He sometimes vague when going over material assumes the class knows more than they actually do.He takes a little getting use to but attend all classes, do all the homework, and try hard, and it should be difficult to fail.
                
                   Not the best prof to take. He grades homework hard, usually making it 40 percent of the overall grade. His tests can be hard, particularly the final. He is not a bad guy though, but be sure not to get on his bad side. He teaches based off his powerpoints. Makes weird jokes sometimes.
                
                   He was a fun teacher to take, not extremely easy, but if you don't understand something, he encourages you to go to his office for help. Great funny guy.
                
                   Very understating and clear. Will always help any student. Would recommend to everyone.
                
                   Through guidance for the course. He will teach you everything in class just participate.
                
                   Really helped me personally.
                
                   amazing professor, he's always there when you have questions, tests are exactly from the material he teaches, the best professor in the EE department!
                
                   Overall a good instructor. He's understanding and willing to work with you.
                
                   Probably the best professor in the EE department. Except he generally teaches graduate class. Once a year he will teach an undergraduate class.
                
                   I like it, very useful!
                
                   I like the field trips
                
                   cool
                
                   He is an awesome professor and will really get you ready for a future in Civil Engineering. If you don't understand what he goes over in lecture, his door is always open and is willing to help you out. He gives you the notes on paper so use them! For the tests go over homework and example problems gone over in class and in the notes.
                
                   Boring class, doesnt care about students, hardly gives any As even though you deserve it, counts attendance (seriously, at that level&#63;&#63;) and not very helpful. Easy compared to other engr professors though.
                
                   Autocad was great with shriram. He is an awsome teacher, but will want you to figure out somethings before you ask him. He's fun
                
                   He was a great prof very funny and approachable. As long as you go to his office hours and ask questions you will pass :-)
                
                   Took two different classes from this professor, he is very helpful on homework and as well on test. I took him for Dynamics and for Control Systems he made the subjects easier to understand and graded very fare but not harsh. Just make sure you can show what you are doing and that you know what you are doing even if you dont get the correct answer.
                
                   She was very hard to understand when she gave lectures but was very understanding when asked questions or asked for help. She chooses favorites based on participation and how much the student sucks up to her. Very nice and helpful TA's who helped a lot and gave a lot of extra help for the class. would take again.
                
                   Dr. Mendoza really cares about her students, unlike most professors for this course she doesn't try to weed people out. She is very lenient on grading and her TA's were amazing which helped a lot. If you put the time in (which is a lot for a two hour class) you will make an A. Only complaint was her accent and she was a little confusing.
                
                   She has a hard accent to understand and can sometimes get lost in her lectures. Content can be stressful to get the hang of, but with time becomes easier. She gives MANY bonus assignments and it is very hard to complete all of them, so don't stress if you don't finish them all. If having trouble in class, stay after and she answers any questions!
                
                   I absolutely loved Dr. Mendoza. Very understanding professor. Sometimes she gets a bit hard to understand during lecture, but she would stay after class everyday to help with any questions in which she was extremely nice and helpful and she clarifies confusion very well. She cares about what she does. She also gave a LOOTT of extra credit.
                
                   Would not take again. She is very nice but tries to treat you like a baby. Lectures are very unclear and she loses train of thought often, plus I barely understood her accent. Assignments are not mandatory, but then she bases her quizzes on those non mandatory assignments, that students mostly do not do.  
                
                   Dr Mendoza is  always willing to help especially those who really need help with the class. she wants everyone to understand the material and get a good grade. she gives many extra bonus exercises that can be used as bonus.  I was able to  make A,, so if you really care about the class you will make an A too. 
                
                   This class was a fairly easy one! The material learned was simplistic and straight forward. Mendoza is a great professor and her test are really easy. The project is a little annoying just because its not very interesting and tedious. Overall it was an easy class, good GPA booster.
                
                   Professor Mendoza is an okay teacher - her teaching style is better for a smaller class, not a 100 student intro class. She "babies" her students and tries to make learning the material fun, but sometimes her metaphors and analogies and ways of explaining fall flat. Overall, she can be helpful and is definitely a nice person, but not first choice.
                
                   Extremely annoying teacher. Impossible to understand. Treats you like a child. Emphasis's attendance. Punishes absences. Do not suggest. 
                
                   This professor is pretty easy!! i mean he would give us a study guide exactly the same as the test!! LOOOVED IT!
                
                   Apart from engineering you will learn wartime stories in Wrights class. Beware, you may get a B even if you have worked hard. Wright is funny. One time he told us how he read his text books and finished his assignments while sitting in a strip club during spring break..haha
                
                   Dan wright is the perfect proffesor for freshman level classes. Definitely take him or Amit for freshman level classes
                
                   He makes a lot of mistakes, especially on the tests. It's hard to understand what he writes on the board, because he's so sloppy. Be prepared to do A LOT of homework.
                
                   His class is easy, reviews for the tests are the tests. He does a good job as a teacher, he can have a bad attitude most of the time. If you disagree with him instead of trying to see your point he gets mad and yells. I have no problem with him being my instructor, but I did get tired of hearing his War stories and how many weapons he knows about.
                
                   His class is easy, reviews for the tests are the tests. He does a good job as a teacher, he can have a bad attitude most of the time. If you disagree with him instead of trying to see your point he gets mad and yells.
                
                   he is a funny guy and keeps class interesting.  I wouldn't say he is easy, but if you do your work you can get a good grade.
                
                   Good prof. Funny and practical.
                
                   He said,  You know why I am your professor&#63;  Because I am good -- extremely good.  Just remember that.   I wouldn't say that he was really that good.  He was only easy. :P
                
                   He is impossible to understand at times, as well as never capable of fully expressing his ideas and instructions in a way that is comprehensible. However, if you show up to class, he guarantees he will not fail any that has perfect attendance.
                
                   
                
                   If you are serious about learning he will notice.  If not then you need to find a new major.  Simple.  You need to ask questions and participate.
                
                   One of the best professors I ever had. As a practicing engineer, I can say that his classes were extremely valuable.
                
                   useless, high attitude for nothing...teaches mathematics in chemical class...useless
                
                   Good professor.  Takes a while to get him out of his shell.  Willing to work with you to help you understand the material.
                
                   Great professor, if you work a bit harder,easy to get A. Follow his class.
                
                   Easy A, but you do not learn much...
                
                   Simply great!!I was lucky to be taught one of the best prof's.
                
                   He's the right instructor to get Advanced Natural Gas Processing with.
                
                   He is the nicest person I've ever seen, and also very knowledgable I his field.
                
                   very useful
                
                   He was a one of the professor that I ever seen.
                
                   A tough professor but comprehensive and helpful.
                
                   he gave me the hope.. if he can be a professor.. I can be a University Dean one day
                
                   HE is the worst professor of all my entire educational career..i have done MS and seen so many professors...he is the worst that my first grade teacher...At Masters level he teaches rheology for 3-4 months which you can study in 3-4 hours..and which has no use in practical life...he sucks bigtime..very biased in grading....
                
                   Don't listen to the other review. Dr. Nix's Univ class is easy, show up, and do one project in your last semester thats it. He is nice, and has an easy class. You don't even need a book.
                
                   During my UNIV course, Dr. Nix had guest speakers that consisted of different professors from different departments that would try to get us to switch our majors. It was a waste of time. He should have done this for some High School class.
                
                   he is very unclear and his classes are basically sh#t. He will definitely get off topic in his classes. 
                
                   Dr. Leung is an outstanding professor for Microprocessor Systems. He has been teaching this material for 12 years and has perfected his methods of teaching. I have taken his class twice but the second time I mastered it and as of know I was offered a TA position under him! One of the best professors out there.
                
                   He knows the material really well but cannot relay the info to you. If you take this class and want an A, you will have to teach yourself the material. He will not answer questions clearly, and gets off topic.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   If you have to take a class with him im sorry.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very unclear about what is going to be on tests and way too much material to know everything.  Average test grades for our class ranged from low 50's to high 60's.  He seems to always be in a rush and never really helps anyone with any questions.  Very hard grader (except on homework)
                
                   Good class, attend regularly.
                
                   Amit is a cool dude and is quite funny. This class is quite hard however and is a slap in the face if you think it's going to be as easy as MEEN 1310 with him.
                
                   Good Class. Lot of work with AutoCAD, but PROE is really cool. Great instructor, very helpful and considerate. Take him if you get a chance.
                
                   Amit is a great teacher, he is very clear and concise. He gets to the point without losing the concept ideas. He is a very effective teacher. I really learned alot from his lectures and him teaching the lab as well helped out even more. He is a real pleasant guy, great to get along with. He is very reasonable. Great professor, if you can take a class with him.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very good Sir, stays very helpful but is also  is at place of work.
                
                   Team Project in every subject every semester.
                
                   The material we learned in this course is what I 'd liked about this course. We are actually learning Mechanical Engineering not like the other courses that involve unnecessary material. Dr. Al-Smadi presents the examples and teaches us to solve them from different aspects. I like the way he connects the course to real life examples.
                
                   He's a probably the toughest professor at TAMUK Mechanical Department, but he strives to create interest in engineering among his students.
                
                   Dr. Alsmadi is an excellent teacher and his dedication shows that he loves what he does. Excellent man that strives for the most he can do...a tough teacher
                
                   Very good professor, the best one I have had this semester.
                
                   Professor is very knoledgable
                
                   Dr. Al-Smadi is actually a cool person. Go to his office and he is really easy to talk to. In terms of him as a professor, he is awful. He changes his mind about things he make mandatory, his exams are very difficult, and his projecs are also confusing. He will hold the class after so he can finish his lesson. NEVER agree to meet for class early!!!
                
                   He will pretend to be your friend and then he will back-stab you by tricking you on tests and failing all who fail to teach themselves the material
                
                   Very friendly guy who just wants to help you succeed. If you have any problems, just go talk to him.
                
                   This class was an easy A back when Kevin thought it. No you learn more, but there is a lot of busy work for only two credits. There is a lot of reading and he goes over very little in class.
                
                   Mr. Moore was a recent graduate and is now working at the University as the Third Engineering of the Training Ship and an instructor. He is VERY advanced for his young age, some may say a genius. He holds his welding class, which should be a simple A, to a very high standard with a lot of work. However, his test are open note, open book, online. 
                
                   Teaches an undergraduate class (INTRO to Wave mechanics) at a graduate level. be prepared to learn partial differential equations on your own because it is not taught in the degree program and he expects everyone to know it. if you miss a class you may as well drop the class. He has no mercy when it comes to grades. Avoid at all costs.
                
                   Dr Hayatdavoodi is new to teaching and it shows. The course is poorly paced with too long spent on easy sections and far too little time spent on much harder topics. He obviously struggles with patience and gets easily frustrated when students don't grasp what he is saying.
                
                   Material is covered very quickly without stopping. He really does want you to learn the material and will try to break it down and do it for the class, however it's always too late. After unanimous exam failure he's re-teaching everything and openly doesn't know what else to do to teach us. In his defense, this is the first semester he's taught 112
                
                   I took this professor twice now for two different classes and his style is the same, he assigns homework but not for a grade. Instead, he'll give a quiz over one of the homework problems during the first 10 minutes of class. His material is easy until it comes time to take the test, thats when it gets unreasonably hard.
                
                   Great teacher
                
                   Great teacher!
                
                   Do yourself a favor and find a solution manual and teach yourself. This professor has the MOST confusing way of explaining the simplest  of anything he teaches. Tests DO NOT reflect homework. Study the example problems. Statics and Dynamics stay away - doesn't have a clue.
                
                   Dr. Um says things like we are all humans and you should know how to study for my test. Then he gives a test and the class average is between a 30 and 40. He is unorganized and there is no logical thought process to the way he develops this course. If you can take it with someone else do yourself a favor.
                
                   This class is not hard at all, just pay attention and read the book. There are quizzes every class which is good! The teacher is sometimes hard to understand because english isnt his first language, but overall he's ok. He doesn't really help much when reviewing the test though.
                
                   The way he teaches the material is confusing and slightly different from how the book shows it. If you ask him for help in his office, he's useless. Gives a quiz every week and rushes you to do one or two problems within 10 minutes, even though they might require AT LEAST 30 minutes to finish. TIP: his test problems are examples in the chapters.
                
                   Great professor. This was a class that prepared me for future classes. He made learning easy and fun.
                
                   You get the impression he does not care for students and they are a nuissance to him and his research. Only teaches this class. Whatever you do don't listen to him for advising. Find the prereqs for yourself and get help from other students if you cant figure out a good path
                
                   He is a very flexible and friendly teacher. Easily approachable and highly knowledgeable on the materials science subject matter. His labs are awesome, we learned a lot in the semester about various materials. grading is fair, if you work hard you will get good grades. he encourages students to actively participate in class.
                
                   Can be very temper-mental. Stay anonymous in the class is the best bet.
                
                   Awesome teacher! He made the class easy and interesting, and more importantly you will definitely learn from him. He uses PowerPoint slides which are accessible on Blackboard at home and his lectures clarify a lot. Plenty of bonus credit opportunities and his test reviews help a LOT. He encourages class discussion big time, so be ready to speak up!
                
                   not sure where he grew up, but this guy has no manners, laughs at you when you get an answer wrong in class, and humiliates you in front of everyone. Not sure he has the  skills or manners to be a teacher.
                
                   He always give the quiz that he never teach, u have to study by yourself. And his study guidfor the quiz is not the quiz actually needed. So u have to study all sections by yourself. He doesn't give student much material and his hand writing is really hard to understand. All in all, his class require self study for all stuff, not many helps at all.
                
                   Conkey knows his material. Helped write the book. Tough exams however . To ace the course you need to spend a lot more time studying from other sources as the textbook does not have a lot of examples. 
                
                   Very care about attendence, better not leave during the clasee, he will ask why you leave. Cannot explain very well, buy you can tell he knows the material. A lot of conception to study and understand. Problem solving very fast and hardly to catch up. My only B in my major classes.
                
                   phew..... I took this class in summer online OMG lots of work no text book used but give u like 1 milion papers to read i struggle with this class he is a cool guy though I ques if you make an effort he lets u go but you will almost cry before the class is over Cool teacher regardless
                
                   Class was hard at first, no books used - only professor's handouts and power point presentations.  I was in serious doubt about my grade until I got a very high score on the Academic Proposal which was 40% of the course grade.
                
                   Power-point based, but you can't accuse the power point. goes fast. poor accent. ask questions only about the power point. no extra work given to help clarify the material. 
                
                   The class is not difficult if you are disciplined and perform well in a self-study environment. Do not expect feedback from Parish as none has been given to me over two courses now. I did, however, learn from the class and received a high grade. FOLLOW HIS FORMAT GUIDE.
                
                   Very difficult when compared to the other professors in this program. Could not use the textbook as a reference in most cases. He was not clear in directions for the final exam. Now that I know I will either avoid or expect less from him as a professor.
                
                   Most difficult Professor I have encountered to date.  Syllabus is vague yet he keeps taking points off on papers referencing instructions in syllabus.  Has a harder grading scale than the normal, 93 and above for an A.  Doesn't like to answer questions, has a bad attitude towards students.  Seems annoyed when asked to clarify gaps in instructions.
                
                   Dr. Zourntos is truly an inspiration!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He does not curve.
                
                   Evan is a great professor who GENUINELY cares about the success of his students. IDIS 240 is a very easy class. Material in class gets posted online. Tests easy, cheat card, final is 2 tests combined, use old quizlets. 1 project, fairly easy. Going to class will help a lot. He knows who attends. Friendly, loves football, family, ID. Slacked, got B.
                
                   All he talks about is himself. I learned nothing besides what I had to teach myself, and everyone deserves an A, but "only an elite few" will get one. I would not take him again, but there is no other option.
                
                   Evan is a great person, an amazing inspiration, and an okay professor.  His classes are based upon group presentations and a few exams.  Show up, do your part, and you will have no problem succeeding!  You will have to learn the test material on your own as he gives out valuable lectures, more often than not pertaining to the test material
                
                   Easy to follow.  Used the book and taught what was inside of it.  Didn't teach a bunch of useless information to waste time.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He mumbles through class so you can't really hear him that well. Almost no one pays attention in class because his explanations do not help. He is helpful outside of class though.
                
                   Pretty good professor. He has an accent, but is not too difficult to understand. Make sure to go to lectures, as the material is nearly impossible to learn on your own. He gave us a lot of extra credit towards the end of the semester. If you go to class and do the work, you will be fine.
                
                   I took his ECEN 248 class. He doesn't teach well, and it is difficult to understand his  accent. He is very rude and mean. Avoid him if you can.
                
                   Dr. Schubert is an interesting & experienced individual, but NOT the best prof. During lecture, he will VERY frequently get sidetracked and tell a story about his experiences in the field. He posts his PPTs so attending isn't necessary. The 2 tests were pretty easy (you get a double sided 8.5x11 cheat sheet). Most of the challenge comes from lab.
                
                   he is ok
                
                   Overall very nice guy, really does care about the students, engages the class. Only complaints were that he didn't seem very knowledgeable about the content of the course. Skips over topics he doesn't know and avoids questions when we're confused. Makes learning the new subjects very frustrating so find other means of learning the material.
                
                   What can I say? He's a stereotypical engineer, but is quirky and funny. He will work with you to help you get the grade you want. He is talkative and knows what he is talking about. He has real-world experience with much of the class's material. Very nice guy, and if you are good at engineering, you'll get an A.
                
                   Isn't very well informed of the content he teaches in ENGR 112. You ask questions and he tends to avoid the answer. However, despite lacking clarity, he seems legitimately interested in his students' well being (assuming they will do the work required). The only other critique I make is that he's typically behind schedule, resulting in frustration.
                
                   This was one of the worst classes I have ever attended. The professor is always unprepared and doesnt teach anything in class. He comes and talks about random things ranging from basketball players to how great his research work was. In addition to this the home works given are unreasonably long, given that he hasnt taught anything in class.
                
                   Excellent
                
                   This is the best class I had in my life. Not only is the homework assignment short and easy, but Dr. Sanchez completely masters the skill to inspire his students about advanced analog IC design. I learnt alot from this class, and enjoy it very much. For those who are interested in analog IC design, TAMU is the school to attend !
                
                   Look for lots of outside class help if you want to pass. His class is not engaging nor is it easy to focus. Sure, I got a good grade but this class felt like such a waste of time. Pick any other engr 112 prof.
                
                   Dr. Oz isn't very helpful. He gets frustrated if you need more help on a topic. Very unclear and due dates are always up in the air. Not too difficult of a class. Not looking forward to 112 in the same class. Good thing is 111 book is used for 112.
                
                   He's very hard to understand being that he's from Turkey, and he doesn't really help much
                
                   This wasn't a hard class to do good in, but he was a tough professor to have. I didn't have any problems with him and he was helpful whenever I asked for help, although others may have had different experiences. Not a bad professor to take at all; definitely less work than any other ENGR111 course.
                
                   It kind of sounds like most ENGR 11 professors are pretty similar. Dr. Oz is a nice guy who cares, but is a little absent minded with this class, expects you to completely understand every little thing he mentions, even some things he forgets to mention. Most of this class depends on you group and the GA in your class. Not the worst, not the best.
                
                   Doesn't help at all. Basically, you and your team members have to learn the entire class material by yourself.
                
                   If you do the work and go to class you will do well.  He always responded to my emails promptly and was ready to help.  Overall, I think he was a great prof.
                
                   Dr. Ozmetin teaches a really tough class.  I struggled at first, but Dr. Ozmetin's lectures and group projects helped so much.  He is a really smart guy, and cares about his students.
                
                   I don't think 111 is a class that is really teacher based as you mostly just follow directions on ecampus and work with your group. If you ask for help he will help you. The rating doesn't really portray him as a professor, he isn't that bad and I wouldn't avoid him if the class fits your schedule.
                
                   zeros on RAT tests and FRQs are not the end of the world, missing homework is
                
                   Here's the deal, Dr. Oz was a nice guy and loved engineering but he was your classic research professor (not there to teach but more to pursue research at the university). The class was boring, test were difficult, half the people slept in class, and the information was very unclear. Find a different professor if you can.
                
                   He doesn't explain the material clear enough. His lectures are too vague. He rarely provide specific examples to the topics we cover in the class. During the second part of the course (MATLAB) he does not even teach the class. TA's will give lectures over the MATLAB. Expect quizes every class. He assigns a lot of homework. 
                
                   I have taken engineering courses ever since high school and even the worst teacher there puts the way he teaches the ENG111 class to shame. The TA's have higher overall lecture time than him yet he expects all the students to understand everything perfectly the first time. If you email him about anything you will promptly get your head bit off. 
                
                   Puts all of his assignments on eCampus and sends emails the day before class with homework to be completed before that class meeting time. When you ask him for help he says either: 'you should know this already' or 'that is not my job/department, go to extra help.' Strict, rude, and impatient. Doesn't use the textbook, everything is online.
                
                   Heavily relies on eCampus and will post assignments not mentioned in class as late as 3 hours before he expects them due.  Always check eCampus the NIGHT before class.  Good luck understanding his lectures, too.
                
                   Not sure about some of the comments previously made on this page -- Otey is extremely knowledgeable and really seems to care as to whether or not his students learn the material. Grades easily. In class assignments are given, so go to class. Our class never heard him yell (addressing previous reviews). Project is a big one so don't procrastinate.
                
                   Easy A, definitely recommend him and the class. Goes over things if you ask. Tests are easy to study for, class average for the first test was a 84. Grades homework easily. Really nice guy
                
                   Prof Otey grades tests fair, homework fairly easy, and projects extremely easy. He moves at a moderate pace and is pretty helpful (unless you are very bad with computers, then is somewhat irritated). Attendance isn't 'mandatory', but work is done in class time.
                
                   Not ready for any answer because he think he is smart or students are stupid. Mess up on grading all the times. Yelling is one of his behaviors for most reasons.
                
                   fun and easy class.  nice prof
                
                   explains things extremely quick and when you ask a question yells at you (literally ive seen it) because he thinks he has already covered it. is impossible to get help from
                
                   Out of all my professors, he is probably my least favorite, but he still is not a bad guy.  He does not present everything as clearly as everyone else, but he still does an OK job.  For those reasons I rated him average.
                
                   Awful person, terrible professor. Dont take his class. Never! Ever! Unless you like to understand stuff on ur own!
                
                   Great professor, I never thought a subject like this could be made so interesting. Funny, witty remarks throughout lecture and very well informed. He is always in his office and very willing to help any time, day or night.
                
                   Good prof, but hard class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Probably the worst teacher I had at A&M.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   HORRIBLE TEACHER!
                
                   
                
                   The course notes contain numerous errors &gt;50 especially in formulas, many are illegible altogether.  The instructor routinely forgets where he left off on the preceding lecture and repeats the material, up to 15-20 minutes wasting valuable time.  The teacher is obviously completely closed to questions because he does not effectively answer them. 
                
                   was a lot of material but he did review before exams and opportunity for extra credit. I really liked his examples from real world and trips to industry.
                
                   lot of work, but he focused on learning concepts and relation to material properties instead of just memorizing and simply knowing the information. I believe the grading was harsh.
                
                   He talks way to fast, flies through the lecture, then expects you to ace the quiz he gives in almost every lecture. Sometimes gives 2 quizzes. Expect homework everyweek. At the end of the semester, requires you to make a video, write a 10 page paper on HIS mistakes, for only 2% extra credit. What the heck. Tests were HARD and LONG, not enough time.
                
                   Probably one of the most confusing classes I've taken. He takes the slides given by the book and reads to them. Doesn't really teach the material. Asking him questions doesn't help if you don't understand what is going on. He gives random quizzes and if you don't instantly know the material, you're screwed. The tests also suck.
                
                   This is by far the worst professor I've had at a&m so far. He is the furthest thing from helpful, and it's amazing how much it seems like he doesn't care about his students. 
                
                   great teacher may come off wierd sometimes and hard to understand but i slept threw his class and passed ....hrhtc
                
                   This was the greatest proffffeeessor that I never had. He was so interesting and I loved him so much!!!
                
                   OMG I FREAKING LOVED THIS GUY! I WOULD HAVE HIS CHILDREN!!!!
                
                   from pulling 9g turns in a B52 bomber to saving the world through engineering on a daily basis he is easily the most abrasive and arrogant teacher ive had. in person he isnt so bad but sitting through his class is like a free sample of hell. im writing this review in class because the lectures are worthless
                
                   His method of teaching is copy/pasting from wikipedia, making a power-point presentation and telling you to read it while he laughs at how stupid you are. Meanwhile saying,&quot;my 10-year-old daughter can do this in her sleep, you morons.&quot;
                
                   I really wish that my mother gave birth to me a year later so I wouldn't have him as a teacher. (He retires this year.)  FML
                
                   This professor is an ****. He's so caught up in himself that he doesn't teach you**** and expects you to take quizzes in 10 seconds while he talks about how great he is and how easy the problems are. This guys the biggest ass I've ever seen and makes going to class so miserable everyday. I feel bad for his son.
                
                   Little competency in classroom decorum, as well as little patience. As a professor of a Intro Engineers class, he spends more time talking of the &quot;fire and brimstone&quot; which accompanies an engineer/student. Lastly, this &quot;Dr.&quot; sees very highly of himself and his past exploits. Three words, Arrogant, Impatient, Narcissistic.
                
                   Asshole
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Do not buy the book for this class, it's a waste of $200. All engineering classes are designed to be hard. It is true he gives a lot of work and he doesn't always teach but they are trying to get you to learn on your own. Generally, you get full points on the homework as long as you try. He will help you if you ask and he is always positive.
                
                   Pretty much what the other guy said. If you can, don't take this professor as any other will be easier. Otherwise, you're in for a ride. Would never take another class from him again. 
                
                   Tons of homework. Awful teacher. Didn't learn anything. I went to every class and actively participated but he just doesn't teach. Take any other professor and it'll be so much easier. He even admitted that all of his assignments are harder than in other sections.
                
                   Although a little too focused on making students laugh at times, Kurwitz adequately understands the new college environment that most of the freshmen were dealing with and did his best to not murder them with work.
                
                   Cable is the best!! If you love LOL Cats, Double Daves Pizza Rolls, and drunken college stories this is the man for you!
                
                   Ok a lot of people here are being dramatic. This is a hard class. Cable is extremely willing to help and really really nice all the time. Just do your work instead of copying or relying on teammates and you'll get an A. I got a 74 on the first test and got a good A on it bc he curved the heck out of it. Just do your work and do your robot.
                
                   Like people say ENG 111 is a hard course no matter who the professor is. At the end of the day Kurwits won't fail you unless your robot never works. I had bad test grades but robot always did what is was suppose to and I ended up with a B. Also you really have to teach yourself everything for this class.
                
                   Terrible experience, would not take again.
                
                   Kurwitz is tough... but this class in general is tough. We have more homework than most of the other sections and our test was way harder (all of his sections had failing averages whereas the other sections had like As and Bs); however, even the guy who made a 19 on his test ended up with a C. He's not going to let you fail. Unless your robots suck
                
                   He's tough, but in general ENGR111 is just a difficult class. You will have additional homework when compared to other sections, but you also don't have to turn in every little thing you do unlike some other sections. He's willing to help you if you reach out to him and he seems to be genuinely invested in his students. I will be taking him for 112
                
                   The class itself is a hard class anyways but having him made it tougher. He assigned a lot of extra assignments that other 111 profs didn't assign. His tests are a lot harder than the other sections as well. He isn't a bad guy just not the best person to teach this class as it doesn't seem he knows the material very well and is unorganized. 
                
                   Kurwitz is a good guy. I'm actually taking him again for 112. Engineering 111 is difficult no matter who you get, Kurwitz does assign a lot of homework though, and it can be difficult. There are help sessions that you can go to and he emails out a lot of helpful resources as well. I would take him over, some of the other professors. 
                
                   Kurwitz is a good guy and he wants you to do well. He assigns more homework than he can grade and I currently have 22 difficult, time consuming assignments that have been ungraded dating to up to two months ago. LOTS of work and it's not always understandable. He can't explain a lot of the work he gives and his tests are hard. Not a bad guy though!
                
                   He doesn't fail anyone. He's sympathetic and helps you when needed. He's always in a good mood and likes to tie in what we're learning to real world applications.
                
                   Engr111 pretty much sucks no matter who you have. Kurwitz is a great guy, but assigns A LOT of difficult hw. You really need to know LabView so YouTube videos or look on the eCampus page for additional videos. I highly recommend going to the help sessions for the class, the TAs clarify most of the material. Hard tests and lots of quizzes
                
                   He offers no help. Assignments given are given without instructions or help on how to do them. If you don't already know what you're doing, don't expect that he will do his job and actually teach you. Find people that understand what is going on and work with them. 
                
                   Dr. Kurwitz is an awesome Prof! It's freshman engineering so it's gonna be hard no matter who you have, but he does a very good job at answering your questions. There are group projects but that's all part of the course. People who don't do well and don't like him are the people who don't want to put the effort in the course.
                
                   He never explains anything, and can be very rude at times.
                
                   He gives us homework without explanation then wants it done.
                
                   This class is great, lots of work but he makes it interesting
                
                   No Comments
                
                   It's a static's class so you have to do problems in the book to help you understand better. He was a very nice professor, he was new to the subject, so a little slow at first and very fast in the end.
                
                   Just all around a really  awful prof. The grades are curved so much a 50 is a C. The professor is not willing to help and expects students to learn while taking a test.
                
                   He's terrible. Take someone, anyone else.  Not impossible, but I worked very hard, and am only gonna make a C.
                
                   Very smart. Well organized. Really knows industrial distribution. Helps students. Uses senior execs as class speakers. One of the best profs I've ever had. Jennings had serious health problems but just gutted it up and kept teaching. He is always smiling and makes his class interesting and fun to atten . Lots of group work and class discussions.
                
                   very good helps students
                
                   Great class, very interesting
                
                   He wasn't a bad teacher at all. He would be rather slow at uploading PowerPoints for tests (post them 30 minutes before a test) which was only the bad part. he's fair on grading.
                
                   One of the only aero profs that actually cares about his students and teaching them. He is awesome in the classroom and at office hours and is always willing to help! Awesome prof :D
                
                   Very helpful but also very strict
                
                   Should receive all teaching awards (if he hasn't already). Exceptional teacher and very approachable. One of those rare Professors who cares whether you learn it.
                
                   Best Prof ever. Extremely funny. Knows the material very well. Wants you to learn.
                
                   Coolest Prof I've had
                
                   Cool Professor.  #1 in Civil Structure.
                
                   Dr Hung is by far the funniest professor I have ever had and has arguably the best dad jokes of all time. He adds a ton of Bonus and Extra points on tests, as well as randomly giving bonus points for attendance. He also does iClicker Q's so attendance is required. Test can be tricky but the Clicker Q's help a lot for tests.
                
                   Completely useless professor. Never comes prepared to class and most of the times what he explains is incorrect. I have had a chance to read this course through on line lectures at a different university and that's how I know what he is teaching is wrong. He is never able to give a straight answer to anything that is asked. Avoid taking this class.
                
                   Great prof. many people do not like him, but those are consistently the same people who do not put any effort into learning the material. It is a hard course, but he is a great prof.
                
                   Completely ruined my entire understanding of core concepts. Useless.
                
                   He always helped me before class, after class, during office hours, and over email. He cares about his students and doesn't make it hard, but programming on a computer is just hard in general.
                
                   Hung is an awesome prof! He gives a lot of extra credit and if you go to class, he gives test questions. All of the test material is in the handbook you purchase at the beginning of the semester, and you're allowed a cheat sheet on exams. He's really fair and he cares about his students doing well. Go to class, do your work, and you'll get an A.
                
                   Dr. Hung is great. He is a funny guy and really smart. Accent is a little difficult but not bad. He made the text book which basically has all the notes except the few he gives in class. Gives extra credit on the test. This is not a class I would skip, has in class quizzes. Class is not hard at all. Just do the work and make a good cheat sheet. 
                
                   He is very knowledgable, but the class was very difficult.
                
                   He is hilarious sometimes, and he is extremely straight forward. There are no tricks or anything. Just go to class, listen, take notes, and do the home work. It's almost a guaranteed passing grade. He lets you use a full 8.5x11 full of formulas for every test. You really must not be putting forth any effort if you fail this class.
                
                   If you can understand his thick Asian accent then you will probably be ok. He addresses that he knows he is hard to understand yet doesn't like to be asked to repeat things. Going to his office is worthless. GRADING IS VERY INCONSTANT. Upside is that the  labs are cool. You get cheat sheets for each test... good or bad&#63; you decide.
                
                   USELESS! If you have her class...just read the book because like many people have said before: she can't teach worth a flip!  The class is still pretty easy although she puts trick questions on her tests...get another prof if you can!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She is the most boring prof in the entire world!!
                
                   oh my god, every word she speaks she sounds like she is about to croak.
                
                   She was not too bad but it would be better to get someone that you will understand better.
                
                   Do not expect anyhelp from her.  She is a mean old lady.  Hopefully she will retire before you have to get her.  If you get her and Munster together your screwd, like me.
                
                   She can't teach worth a flip!
                
                   You helped me more than you can imagine.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I love this class. It's interesting and he has a talent to get student engaged. He teaches material very helpful for my research.
                
                   He is the best professor ever. I ve never met a professor so helpful with his students. He teaches a very difficult subject and - of course - you have to put effort in that.
                
                   Absolutely amazing. This guy is a legend in structural reliability and played a very influential role in my education. I have the utmost respect for the guy.
                
                   Gardoni's explanations are always very clear and he really cares that we really learn the material. I would recommend taking a class with him to everybody. I wish I could take him for every class.
                
                   Great Prof! Topic very interesting. A must-take course. I loved it!
                
                   Best prof at A&M. Very interesting topic. I loved it :)
                
                   Great prof!! and smoking hot guy :)
                
                   Tough Topic, Hard to Understanding Class.
                
                   Dr. Tracy was very good at lecturing HOWEVER beware his temper. He flew off the handle on multiple occasions, almost always made students feel stupid in front of the class after they asked questions on the material, and was generally rude. I don't recommend taking him unless anxiety helps you.
                
                   Wow, I really felt like I learned things in this class.  Overall, the course was hard because of all the time spent on group projects and homework, but it was doable.  As for Fullerton himself, he wasn't too bad.... gave some powerful lectures and offered help when I'd ask for it.  He's a relatively tough grader, so watch out for that.        
                
                   Dr. Fullerton likes to do things his own way, and has a pretty good way of doing things! He is very clear in lecture and always takes feedback from his students to ensure they are understanding the material. He writes his own tests and emails students with regular updates. Only issue is a too short time limit on exams. Take Fullerton if you can!
                
                   Dr. Fullerton takes pride in doing things his way and believing that as the correct way. His lectures are clear, and he consistently takes feedback from the students to make sure they are understanding the material. He writes all of his own tests. Only issue is there is too little time given on all of his tests, work fast! TAKE FULLERTON FOR ENGR!
                
                   Tracy is a great guy, who really wants you to do well in his class. No matter what this is a tough class, especially with groups and the projects. More the most part he will try to help you out as much as possible. Probably one of the better choices for this class.
                
                   Robot project takes up a lot of your time. He moves due dates around constantly, but keeps the course on track.  Lecture slides are posted and he lectures well. 
                
                   Fullerton keeps his lectures interesting and answers any and all questions. There are 3 group projects during the semester that you will work on with your assigned team that aren't too difficult, just very time consuming. Make sure you watch every single module as you will be tested on them at the beginning and end of classes.
                
                   real fun class to have. Really useful.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   didnt really want to talk to you.  just there to do his job and leave but the projects were easy.
                
                   Explains the problems well, book use is not required but smart, full of himself, but will help
                
                   Great professor!  Learned more from this guy that all the other PETE profs rolled together!  He is very interesting to listen to and explains everything so well,  I would take every class he teaches!
                
                   no textbook used
                
                   Impossible to understand: emails, notes, and tests have an unbelievable amount of terrible grammar; numerous conflicts between textbook(written by him), posted notes, and class lecture formulae; highly ambiguous grading methods; gives six days to complete a semester project; holds class ten minutes late every day, but he's unavoidable.
                
                   Dr. Adams is all that is man. He is an absolutely amazing professor and an amazing person as well. He has a lot of outside experience and has won several teaching awards. His classes are tough but they are well worth it if you put in the work!
                
                   Marv is absolutely brilliant, both as a teacher, and researcher.  I did decent in his course (and learned much as a TA for him), but appreciated the hard work he put into the pedagogical side of things. Every year he re-examines his approach, and updates it according his experiences that year.  He's well earned his teaching awards over the years.
                
                   Really awesome Prof... I learned a lot in his class!
                
                   Marv is in my mind a revolutionary teacher - one who not only has a marvelous ability to teach complicated technical concepts in a simple conceptual manner, but has an extremely open mind with regards to pedagogical processes.  I've cannot express how he has changed my life in terms of my profession
                
                   he is very nice man but a very bad teacher,I rather die then take him again , Do not Take him if you want to learn and understand,I took him for thermo and he did not teach it as Mechanical major;he taught as environment and his tests is nothing like the HW or lecturer .I will avoid him like the plague , wait until someone else teaching thermo
                
                   You will use every bit of the time he gives you for tests. When he says that you "can" use something.... DO IT! You will need it. 
                
                   She seems to have no tech knowledge enough to teach
                
                   NA
                
                   Great class, flexible on homework. Did some group projects that were fun. Puts meeting in front of teaching therefore no homework on those days.
                
                   aaaa
                
                   Take her class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   i took her for my college algebra class. fun, great, and very easy teacher. if she is teaching any class that you want or need, make sure you sign up for her class. i suck and hate math, and i got an &quot;A&quot; in her class.
                
                   Four years ago when he was new at wt he taught statics. He cared most of us and shared lots info and knowledge with us. First time it was hard to catch his accent but no big problem
                
                   I just recalled. You must enjoy a long night exam on each test. Dr. Chang is the best professor but I couldn't follow his enthusiasm. I am repeating this class again.
                
                   Seems funny teacher..care most of us...a little accent problem..but I am sure he is the best professor at wt.
                
                   Good
                